Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 4. Alaska Human Relations Commission.

Sec. 44.19.600.
Creation of commission; composition.

There is created in the Office of the Governor the Alaska Human Relations Commission.

The commission consists of two executive-branch members and seven public members, appointed by the governor, who serve at the pleasure of the governor.

At least one public member must be a person who manages a household that includes the person’s spouse and at least one child and who is not otherwise employed. At least one public member must be under the age of 21 at the time of appointment.

History.

(E.O. No. 84 § 7 (1993))

Revisor’s notes. —

This section number has been used twice, once for the material added by sec. 2, ch. 69, SLA 1964, amended by sec. 1, ch. 101, SLA 1965, and repealed by sec. 10, ch. 200, SLA 1972; and the second time for the material added by E.O. 84.

Sec. 44.19.602.
Appointment; officers.

The members shall be appointed on a nonpartisan and nondiscriminatory basis by the governor. In making the appointments, the governor shall give due consideration to

the recommendations made by civic organizations, women’s organizations, educational and vocational groups, employer groups, labor unions, church groups, homemakers’ clubs and organizations, and other groups having an interest in the welfare and status of women;

statewide geographical representation of the commission;

minority and low-income representation;

representation of senior citizens, persons with disabilities, and persons from a variety of occupational categories; and

representation of persons with different marital statuses and persons with various numbers of children.

The commission shall elect one of its members as chair. The chair may appoint other officers as necessary.

History.

(E.O. No. 84 § 7 (1993))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2009, under AS

01.05.031

, in (a)(1) of this section, the revisor of statutes substituted “homemakers’ ” for “homemaker’s” in order to correct a grammatical error.

Sec. 44.19.604.
Terms of office; compensation.

The term of office of a member of the commission is three years. Terms shall be staggered. A member may not serve more than six consecutive years.

A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. A person appointed to a vacancy serves for the unexpired portion of a term.

Public members of the commission receive no compensation for their services but are entitled to per diem and travel allowances authorized by law for other boards and commissions.

History.

(E.O. No. 84 § 7 (1993))

Sec. 44.19.606.
Meetings.

A majority of the members constitutes a quorum for conducting business and exercising the powers of the commission. The commission shall meet at the call of the chairperson, at the request of the majority of the members, or at a regularly scheduled time as determined by a majority of the members.

History.

(E.O. No. 84 § 7 (1993))

Sec. 44.19.608.
Purpose and powers relating to women’s issues.

A purpose of the commission is to improve the status of women in the state by conducting research, by serving as a referral service for information and education that will help women avail themselves of existing resources to meet their needs, and by making and implementing recommendations on the opportunities, needs, problems, and contributions of women in the state including

education;

homemaking;

civil and legal rights; and

labor and employment.

To accomplish this purpose, the commission may

act as a clearinghouse and coordinating body for government and nongovernment information relating to the status of women;

cooperate with public and private agencies in joint efforts to study and resolve problems relating to the status of women in Alaska;

accumulate and compile information concerning discrimination against women;

disseminate the results of research and compilation of data acquired under (3) of this subsection by publication and other methods such as public hearings, conferences, and seminars;

study and analyze all facts relating to Alaska laws, regulations, and guidelines with respect to equal protection for women under the state constitution;

recommend legislative and administrative action on equal treatment and opportunities for women;

encourage women to utilize their capabilities and to assume leadership roles;

encourage the development of regional and municipal women’s councils or commissions.

History.

(E.O. No. 84 § 7 (1993))

Sec. 44.19.610.
Duties relating to children’s issues.

The commission shall develop a comprehensive statewide plan that identifies the needs of children and youth, individually and as they relate to their families, and make recommendations to enhance their quality of life. In meeting this charge, the commission may

recommend the services and programs that should be available for children and families in the areas of child care, health, social services, education, special education, child protection, parent and staff training, nutrition, poverty, mental health, safety, and employment of youth;

identify the service needs of children and where gaps and overlaps in services exist;

monitor the emerging needs of and problems facing children, and develop effective, comprehensive, and coordinated strategies to address those needs and problems;

develop and recommend adoption of a process for monitoring and evaluating children’s programs;

provide opportunities for the public to participate in the planning and development of children’s programs and policies;

receive and act upon requests for recommendations from parents, state officials, members of state advisory committees, legislators, representatives of the state court system, and providers of children’s services on matters related to children and youth;

meet with and make recommendations to state officials and members of advisory committees who are responsible for the expenditure of state and federal money and provide recommendations to the legislature and the department on structural and procedural changes, contracting of services, establishment of standards, and the consolidation of efforts designed to deliver services in a more cost-effective manner;

serve as a statewide clearinghouse for government and nongovernment programs and resources relating to children, youth, and families;

serve as an advocate for the interests of children by informing the public, including leaders of the business community, educators, local and state officials, the legal system, and the communications media of the nature and scope of problems faced by children;

coordinate efforts and consult and cooperate with persons, departments, organizations, and groups, including other boards and commissions, interested in the problems and concerns of children and youth; and

make recommendations to the governor, legislature, and state officials with respect to legislation, regulations, and appropriations for programs or services that benefit children and youth.

History.

(E.O. No. 84 § 7 (1993))

Revisor’s notes. —

This section number has been used twice, once for the material added by sec. 2, ch. 69, SLA 1964, amended by secs. 2-4, ch. 101, SLA 1965, and repealed by sec. 10, ch. 200, SLA 1972; and the second time for the material added by E.O. 84.

Sec. 44.19.612.
General powers.

The commission may

use voluntary and uncompensated services of private persons and organizations as may be made available to the commission;

select and retain the services of consultants whose advice is considered necessary to assist the commission in obtaining information;

establish standing committees among the members to investigate and make recommendations on various areas of concern;

create task forces composed of commission members and other experts as needed;

hold public hearings;

establish and maintain an office in Anchorage, or at a location determined to be the most appropriate location by a majority vote of the commission, and hire an executive director and technical and clerical staff that are necessary to perform the duties of the commission;

accept monetary gifts or grants from the federal government or an agency of it, from any charitable foundation or professional association or from any other reputable sources for implementation of any program necessary or desirable for carrying out the purposes of the commission;

take other actions reasonably necessary to carry out the duties of the commission.

History.

(E.O. No. 84 § 7 (1993))

Sec. 44.19.614.
Methodology.

When conducting research, acting as a referral service, serving as a forum for ideas, and developing recommendations related to the welfare of women, the commission shall solicit and consider information and views from a variety of constituencies in order to represent the broad spectrum of diversity that exists with respect to possible approaches for meeting women’s needs in the state.

In formulating the strategy to address the needs of and problems facing children, the commission shall actively solicit advice and information from children and youth of all ages and socioeconomic backgrounds. The commission shall also seek advice and information from parents and children’s services providers, including those with expertise in the areas of mental health, health care, prenatal care, adolescent drug and alcohol treatment, education, special education, early childhood education, early childhood special education, nonprofit funding sources, child abuse and neglect, domestic violence, child care, dependence, delinquency and the justice system, minority issues, and family support systems.

History.

(E.O. No. 84 § 7 (1993))

Sec. 44.19.616.
Annual report.

The commission shall prepare and publish an annual report on the status of children and women in the state, the commission’s proceedings for the previous calendar year, and its recommendations and proposals for change. The commission shall provide the governor with copies of the report by the 15th day of each regular legislative session and notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(E.O. No. 84 § 7 (1993); am § 86 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 44.19.618.
Technical assistance and staff support.

The executive branch departments shall cooperate with the commission and provide technical assistance to the commission upon the request of the commission. The commission may use legal, technical, secretarial, and administrative services as may be provided by the governor.

History.

(E.O. No. 84 § 7 (1993))

Secs. 44.19.620 — 44.19.627.
Establishment of council, appointment, compensation, officers, meetings, council as state planning entity, functions of council, and administration. [Repealed, § 85 ch 58 SLA 1999.]

Secs. 44.19.635 — 44.19.639.
Alaska Seismic Hazards Safety Commission. [Repealed, E.O. No. 105, § 4 (2003).
For current law, see AS 44.37.065 — 44.37.069.]

Revisor’s notes. —

Executive Order 105 identifies the last of the three sections repealed as “AS 44.17.639.”
This was interpreted as a repeal of AS 44.19.639 to correct a manifest error.

Sec. 44.19.640.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.074.]